Oklahoma, session 2026, HB1843.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:
SECTION 1. NEW LAW A new section of law not to be
codified in the Oklahoma Statutes reads as follows:
This act shall be known and may be cited as the "Community
Quality of Life Enhancement Act".
SECTION 2. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified
in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 9101 of Title 62, unless there
is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:
The Legislature finds that communities within the state would
benefit from access to additional funding sources to promote a high
Req. No. 10745 Page 1

qual ity of life. Such funding should be utilized by the communities
based on an allocation system using a per capita method.
SECTION 3. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified
in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 9102 of Title 62, unless there
is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:
Local communities shall establish a board in order to make
applications to the Oklahoma Department of Commerce for available
funds pursuant to the provisions of this act.
SECTION 4. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified
in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 9103 of Title 62, unless there
is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:
The monies in the Community Quality of Life Enhancement
Revolving Fund may be utilized by eligible communities for:
1. Infrastructure improvements that impact quality of life;
2. Parks and recreational facilities;
3. Public transportation enhancements;
4. Cultural and community centers;
5. Public art and beautification; and
6. Environmental conservation projects.
SECTION 5. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified
in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 9104 of Title 62, unless there
is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:
The expenditures from the Community Qualify of Life Enhancement
Revolving Fund and other expenditures governed by this act, if made
Req. No. 10745 Page 2

in a ccordance with the requirements of this act, shall be construed
as an expenditure of public funds in furtherance of governmental
functions and for the purpose of conferring general and uniform
benefits resulting from the expenditures upon the residents and
other legal entities located in eligible communities.
SECTION 6. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified
in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 9105 of Title 62, unless there
is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:
There is hereby created in the State Treasury a revolving fund
for the Oklahoma Department of Commerce to be designated the
"Community Quality of Life Enhancement Revolving Fund". The fund
shall be a continuing fund, not subject to fiscal year limitations,
and shall consist of all monies received by the Oklahoma Department
of Commerce pursuant to Section 7 of this act. All monies accruing
to the credit of said fund are hereby appropriated and may be
budgeted and expended by the Oklahoma Department of Commerce for the
purpose of making allocations to eligible communities to implement
the provisions of this act. Expenditures from said fund shall be
made upon warrants issued by the State Treasurer against claims
filed as prescribed by law with the Director of the Office of
Management and Enterprise Services for approval and payment.
SECTION 7. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified
in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 9106 of Title 62, unless there
is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:
Req. No. 10745 Page 3

A. Funding for the Community Quality of Life Enhancement
Revolving Fund shall be derived from the income tax revenue which is
attributable to the increment of twenty-five hundredths of one
percent (0.0025) of the highest rate of tax imposed on the taxable
income of individuals pursuant to Section 2355 of Title 68 of the
Oklahoma Statutes.
B. The balance of the Community Quality of Life Enhancement
Fund shall not exceed Two Hundred Fifty Million Dollars
($250,000,000.00).
C. All revenue that would otherwise be apportioned to the Fund
once the maximum fund balance prescribed by this section is reached
shall be apportioned according to the requirements of Section 2352
of Title 68 of the Oklahoma Statutes.
SECTION 8. This act shall become effective July 1, 2025.
SECTION 9. It being immediately necessary for the preservation
of the public peace, health or safety, an emergency is hereby
declared to exist, by reason whereof this act shall take effect and
be in full force from and after its passage and approval.

60-1-10745 MAH 01/15/25




Req. No. 10745 Page 4